Tennessee, session 114, HB2322.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 44-15-115, is amended by
designating the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new
subsection:
(b) The commissioner shall annually report the amount of fees, fines, and
proceeds resulting from the sale of seized properties collected under this chapter during
the prior calendar year to the chairperson of the senate energy, agriculture and natural
resources committee and the chairperson of the committee of the house of
representatives having jurisdiction over agriculture.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2322
012765
- 1 -